Utah statutes.
53A-13-102.   Instruction on the harmful effects of alcohol, tobacco, and
controlled substances -- Rulemaking authority -- Assistance from the Division
of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.
(1) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules providing for instruction
at each grade level on the harmful effects of alcohol, tobacco, and controlled
substances upon the human body and society.  The rules shall require but are
not limited to instruction on the following:
(a)  teaching of skills needed to evaluate advertisements for, and media
portrayal of, alcohol, tobacco, and controlled substances;
(b)  directing students towards healthy and productive alternatives to the use
of alcohol, tobacco, and controlled substances; and
(c)  discouraging the use of alcohol, tobacco, and controlled substances.
(2)  At the request of the board, the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental
Health shall cooperate with the board in developing programs to provide this
instruction.
(3)  The board shall participate in efforts to enhance communication among
community organizations and state agencies, and shall cooperate with those
entities in efforts which are compatible with the purposes of this section.
